Texas, session 891, HB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 141.009, Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 141.009.  STANDARDS. The executive commissioner by rule shall establish health and safety standards for youth camps. The standards may relate to: (1)  adequate and proper supervision at all times of camp activities; (2)  qualifications for directors, supervisors, and staff and sufficient numbers of those persons; (3)  proper safeguards for sanitation and public health; (4)  adequate medical services for personal health and first aid; (5)  proper procedures for food preparation, handling, and mass feeding; (6)  healthful and sufficient water supply; (7)  proper waste disposal; (8)  proper water safety procedures for swimming pools, lakes, and waterways; (9)  safe boating equipment; (10)  proper maintenance and safe use of motor vehicles; (11)  safe buildings and physical facilities; (12)  proper fire precautions; (13)  safe and proper recreational and other equipment; (14)  proper regard for density and use of the premises; [and] (15)  records of criminal convictions of camp personnel; and (16)  easily accessible telephones or other means of real-time communication during an emergency event. SECTION 2.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0091 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN; CAMP STAFF AND VOLUNTEER TRAINING.  (a)  A youth camp operator shall: (1)  develop and implement a written emergency operations plan with procedures for responding to an emergency event, including: (A)  a natural disaster; (B)  a lost camper; (C)  a fire; (D)  a transportation emergency; (E)  a severe illness; (F)  an epidemic; (G)  a severe injury; (H)  a serious accident; (I)  a fatality; (J)  an unauthorized or unknown individual present on the camp's premises; (K)  an aquatic emergency, if applicable to the camp; (L)  an emergency specific to the camp's location or activities; and (M)  any other emergency event designated in department rules; and (2)  annually review and as necessary update the plan. (b)  The emergency operations plan must include specific procedures for campers, camp staff, and camp volunteers to follow in an emergency event, including procedures for: (1)  sheltering in or evacuating from camp buildings and the camp; (2)  controlling vehicular traffic on the camp's premises; and (3)  notifying and communicating with: (A)  the local emergency medical services provider, the local fire department, and the local sheriff's department; and (B)  camp administrative and medical services staff. (c)  A youth camp operator shall submit to the department in the form and manner the department prescribes the youth camp's emergency operations plan.  The department shall review the camp's plan and determine whether the plan satisfies the requirements of this section and department rules. (d)  A youth camp operator shall conspicuously post the camp's emergency operations plan in: (1)  the camp's on-site administrative building; and (2)  each building occupied or used by campers, camp staff, or camp volunteers. (e)  Before the beginning of each camp session, a youth camp operator shall: (1)  provide to each camp staff member or volunteer comprehensive training on the camp's emergency operations plan that addresses each procedure included in the plan; and (2)  assign to each camp staff member or volunteer specific responsibilities for implementing the plan. (f)  At the beginning of each camp session and in the manner prescribed by department rules, youth camp staff shall instruct campers on the procedures to follow in the event of a fire, disaster, camp evacuation, or other emergency event. (g)  A youth camp shall maintain in the camp's on-site administrative office records documenting the successful completion by each camp staff member and volunteer of the training required by Subsection (e). (h)  A youth camp operator shall annually provide the evacuation procedures detailed in the camp's emergency operations plan to the emergency management coordinator of the county in which the camp is located for review by and comments from the coordinator. (i)  The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.